Florida, session 2026, HB1059.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
42
43 Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Florida Speech
44 and Debate Education Act of 2026."
45 Section 2. Section 683.338, Florida Statutes, is created
46 to read:
47 683.338 Florida Speech and Debate Week.—
48 (1) The first Tuesday in November of each year is
49 designated as "Florida Speech and Debate Week" to:
50 (a) Recognize the academic, civic, and leadership value of
Page 2 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1059-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1059 2026
51 competitive speech and debate.
52 (b) Honor educators, coaches, judges, and school districts
53 that support debate programming.
54 (c) Inspire students statewide to participate in debate as
55 a pathway to civic engagement.
56 (d) Promote the state's role as the national leader in
57 scholastic speech and debate.
58 (2) The Department of Education, local school districts,
59 local governments, and other agencies are encouraged to sponsor
60 events, exhibitions, and recognitions celebrating the impact of
61 speech and debate in the state.
62 Section 3. Section 1003.49967, Florida Statutes, is
63 created to read:
64 1003.49967 Speech and debate in public education.—
65 (1) LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.—The Legislature:
66 (a) Recognizes that speech and debate significantly
67 improve literacy, critical thinking, research ability, civic
68 knowledge, and leadership development for students.
69 (b) Recognizes that this state's civics and debate
70 expansion has become a national model, increasing access in all
71 regions.
72 (c) Finds that sustaining and improving this success
73 requires a permanent statewide organization with specialized
74 expertise, program capacity, and year-round operational support.
75 (d) Finds that the Florida Debate Initiative (FDI) has
Page 3 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1059-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1059 2026
76 demonstrated statewide effectiveness and is uniquely positioned
77 to ensure continuity, equitable access, quality programming,
78 tournament infrastructure, and instructional rigor.
79 (e) Intends to establish a comprehensive, statewide
80 infrastructure that expands, supports, and elevates K–20 speech
81 and debate education.
82 (2) STATEWIDE SPEECH AND DEBATE ORGANIZATION—
83 (a) The FDI is designated as the official statewide speech
84 and debate organization responsible for managing, developing,
85 and expanding K–20 speech and debate programs. The FDI shall:
86 (b) Manage the official Florida Speech and Debate League
87 and its regional teams and maintain the operation of league
88 tournaments, regional teams, and judge-training systems.
89 (c) Establish statewide competition rules, ballots,
90 judging standards, and tournament calendars.
91 (d) Operate or supervise district, regional, and state
92 tournaments.
93 (e) Train and certify coaches, judges, volunteers, and
94 tournament staff.
95 (f) Provide statewide programmatic support including:
96 1. Student programs, including American Dream Debates and
97 Veterans Day Speech Contest.
98 2. Leadership and services programs, including the Salute
99 to Service Veteran-Student Mentorship Program.
100 3. Competitive training for students, including ProCamp
Page 4 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1059-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1059 2026
101 for varsity competitors and middle school and high school summer
102 debate camps.
103 4. Educator training, including DebateED 101, DebateED
104 201, and summer coach retreats for new coaches.
105 5. Postsecondary programs, including the FDI Fellows
106 Collegiate Internship Program and the Civics Immersion
107 Experience in Washington, D.C.
108 6. Other public service initiatives.
109 (g) Maintain statewide data reporting and annual
110 accountability.
111 (h) Work constructively with nonstate‑ sanctioned leagues
112 while upholding the state's civic and patriotic development
113 goals.
114 (i) In partnership with the Department of Education,
115 establish regional traveling debate teams to represent the state
116 in national competitions. The FDI shall manage the team
117 selection, coaching assignments, training schedules, and
118 competition logistics. The regional teams shall:
119 1. Expand access for students from Title I, rural, and
120 emerging programs.
121 2. Provide advanced competitive training and coaching.
122 3. Strengthen the state's national competitive presence.
123 4. Prioritize all of the following when selecting students
124 for participation:
125 a. Public school students.
Page 5 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1059-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1059 2026
126 b. Geographic diversity.
127 c. Competitive performance and leadership potential.
128 (3) USE OF FUNDS.—Subject to legislative appropriation,
129 the FDI may use funds for:
130 (a) Administrative operations including staffing,
131 insurance, compliance, reporting, and statewide infrastructure.
132 (b) Programmatic operations, including curriculum,
133 training, summer programs, workshops, camps, and mentorship
134 programs.
135 (c) Tournament operations, including tournament logistics,
136 staff, judge training, technology, awards, and regional team
137 operations.
138 (d) Travel, lodging, training, and transportation for
139 participants, including the creation of the Academic Competition
140 Transportation Grant Program. The grant program shall be
141 administered by the FDI and the department and shall give
142 priority to rural, Title I, and transportation-limited school
143 districts. Grant program funds shall be used to provide school
144 districts with funds for all of the following:
145 1. Bus and charter costs.
146 2. Fuel expenses.
147 3. Driver compensation.
148 4. Travel-related expenses for competitive speech and
149 debate.
150 (e) Public‑ private partnership development including
Page 6 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1059-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1059 2026
151 sponsorship and philanthropic support.
152 (4) REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.—
153 (a) The FDI shall annually provide an accountability
154 report to the Department of Education and publish such report on
155 its website. The report must include:
156 1. The number of students participating in programs by
157 school district and student demographics.
158 2. The number of active speech and debate teams statewide.
159 3. Competitive and educational data and outcomes.
160 4. A summary of expenditures by major category, as
161 determined by the department.
162 5. Any other information requested by the department.
163 (b) Each school district shall annually provide a report
164 to the department. The report must include:
165 1. The number of active speech and debate teams.
166 2. Student participation rates in such teams and
167 competitions.
168 3. Competitive performance and public—service engagement.
169 4. Transportation, facilities, and administrative support
170 received by the district.
171 5. Any barriers to expansion and resources needed by the
172 district.
173 (c) The department shall annually summarize statewide
174 findings and publish an annual report that includes the data
175 provided under paragraphs (a) and (b). Such report must be
Page 7 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1059-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1059 2026
176 published on the department's website.
177 (5) SCHOOL DISTRICT OBLIGATIONS.—Each school district:
178 (a) Must ensure reasonable parity in transportation,
179 facilities, administrative support, and resources provided to
180 competitive speech and debate teams and interscholastic athletic
181 teams.
182 (b) May use motor carriers and charter services to
183 transport students to academic competitions, including speech
184 and debate tournaments.
185 (6) FLORIDA SPEECH AND DEBATE HALL OF FAME.—
186 (a) There is created the Speech and Debate Hall of Fame,
187 which shall be located in the Capitol in a publicly accessible
188 area or at another suitable location designated by the Florida
189 Historic Capitol Museum Director. The Speech and Debate Hall of
190 Fame shall serve as the official statewide institution
191 recognizing exceptional contributions to competitive speech and
192 debate in the state and:
193 1. Honor distinguished students, coaches, educators,
194 alumni, veterans, public servants, benefactors, and supporters
195 who have elevated speech and debate in Florida.
196 2. Preserve the history, impact, and cultural significance
197 of competitive debate.
198 3. Inspire future generations of Florida students to
199 pursue speech, debate, public leadership, and civic excellence.
200 (b) The Speech and Debate Hall of Fame shall be
Page 8 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1059-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1059 2026
201 administered jointly by the Florida Education Foundation and the
202 Commissioner of Education, or his or her designee.
203 (c) The Florida Education Foundation shall convene a
204 committee to establish nomination and selection procedures that
205 ensure representation from:
206 1. Speech and debate educators.
207 2. Former competitors.
208 3. School district administrators.
209 4. Community stakeholders.
210 5. The FDI.
211 (d) The Speech and Debate Hall of Fame shall be funded
212 subject to legislative appropriation, private donations, and
213 sponsorships. Such funding may be used for exhibits, archival
214 material, digital displays, and recognition ceremonies.
215 (7) SPEECH AND DEBATE ENDORSEMENT FOR CERTIFIED TEACHERS.—
216 The State Board of Education shall establish a speech and debate
217 endorsement for teaching certificates issued pursuant to s.
218 1012.56.
219 (a) The endorsement must:
220 1. Recognize specialized instructional and coaching
221 expertise in competitive speech and debate.
222 2. Promote high‑ quality instruction and competitive
223 standards statewide.
224 3. Strengthen district capacity to launch, expand, and
225 sustain debate programs.
Page 9 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1059-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1059 2026
226 (b) The state board shall establish the requirements to
227 earn an endorsement in speech and debate. Such requirements
228 must, at a minimum, include:
229 1. Completion of:
230 a. Approved coursework in argumentation, rhetoric,
231 communication, or debate instruction; or
232 b. Equivalent professional development offered by the
233 Florida Debate Initiative or state colleges.
234 2. Demonstrated competency in rules, events, and
235 competitive standards of scholastic debate.
236 (c) The endorsement shall qualify for professional
237 development and credit for the renewal of a teaching
238 certificate.
239 (d) School districts are encouraged to provide salary
240 supplements or stipend of teachers who hold the speech and
241 debate endorsement.
242 (8) INSTITUTE FOR SPEECH AND DEBATE INNOVATION.—
243 (a) There is established within the Florida Virtual School
244 the Institute for Speech and Debate to expand instructional
245 access and technological modernization for speech and debate
246 instruction.
247 (b) The institute shall:
248 1. Develop online curriculum and instructional modules in
249 speech and debate.
250 2. Create artificial intelligence‑ based coaching tools,
Page 10 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1059-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1059 2026
251 digital judging tutorials, and analytics dashboards.
252 3. Produce virtual and augmented reality simulations for
253 competitive practice.
254 4. Ensure equitable access for school districts lacking
255 onsite coaching capacity.
256 (c) Materials produced by the institute shall be owned by
257 the state for public use.
258 (d) All tools and platforms created or used by the
259 institute must comply with state and federal student privacy
260 laws.
261 Section 4. Section 1004.0983, Florida Statutes, is created
262 to read:
263 1004.0983 Postsecondary speech and debate education; dual
264 enrollment.—
265 (1) The Board of Governors and the State Board of
266 Education shall develop and establish undergraduate and graduate
267 coursework, certificate programs, and micro-credentials in
268 speech and debate education, coaching, and tournament
269 operations. The Department of Education shall adopt such courses
270 into the statewide course numbering system under s. 1007.24.
271 (2) Such coursework may include:
272 (a) Rhetoric, argumentation, and communication theory.
273 (b) Coaching methods and competitive event instruction.
274 (c) Tournament management and adjudication.
275 (d) Public speaking pedagogy.
Page 11 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1059-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1059 2026
276 (3) Such coursework must be available through in-person,
277 hybrid, and virtual classes.
278 (4) The Articulation Coordinating Committee shall approve
279 a list of such courses to include in the state's dual enrollment
280 program. If feasible, such courses shall:
281 (a) Be used to meet the requirements for a standard high
282 school diploma under s. 1003.4282.
283 (b) Be eligible for a diploma endorsement signifying
284 advanced competency in speech and debate.
285 (c) Be available through distance-learning options to
286 ensure statewide access.
287 (5) State universities and Florida College System
288 institutions are encouraged to partner with the Florida Debate
289 Initiative to align courses with statewide competitive standards
290 and coaching needs.
291 Section 5. (1) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of
292 $2,400,000 in recurring funds is appropriated from the General
293 Revenue Fund to the Department of Education for the Florida
294 Debate Initiative for administrative operations, programmatic
295 operations, tournament operations, training, coaching support,
296 and statewide infrastructure.
297 (2) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $250,000 in
298 recurring funds is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to
299 the Department of Education for the Florida Debate Initiative to
300 fund regional traveling debate teams, including training,
Page 12 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1059-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1059 2026
301 coaching, travel, lodging, and competition registration and
302 costs.
303 (3) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $700,000 in
304 recurring funds is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to
305 the Department of Education for the Florida Debate Initiative to
306 administer and fund the Academic Competition Transportation
307 Grant Program.
308 (4) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $750,000 in
309 recurring funds is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to
310 the Florida Virtual School Institute for Speech and Debate
311 Innovation for the purposes of this act.
312 (5) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $500,000 in
313 recurring funds is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to
314 the Department of Education for the creation of endorsements for
315 teaching certificates, professional development, and the
316 operation of the Speech and Debate Hall of Fame pursuant to this
317 act.
318 (6) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $250,000 in
319 nonrecurring funds is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund
320 to the Department of Education for a physical or digital Speech
321 and Debate Hall of Fame exhibit.
322 Section 6. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.
Page 13 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1059-00